District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.117

Severability.

If any particular provision of this subchapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this subchapter and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby. If any action or inaction contemplated under this subchapter is determined to be contrary to the requirements of applicable law, such action or inaction shall not be necessary for the purpose of issuance of the bonds, and the validity of the bonds shall not be adversely affected.

Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-28, § 17, 52 DCR 8093

History